District of Columbia statutes.
47-4635

UNCF — 10-year real property tax abatement.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term:

(1)

“DCRA” means the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs.

(2)

“Property” means the real property in Square 441, as referenced in the District of Columbia Office of the Surveyor Record of Squares, Book II, Page 441, that is owned by UNCF.

(3)

“UNCF” means the United Negro College Fund, Inc., a New York nonprofit corporation founded in 1944 by Dr. Frederick Patterson that provides assistance to approximately 60,000 students a year at 900 colleges and universities and 39 historically black colleges and universities nationwide.

(b)

The real property taxes imposed by Chapter 8 of this title on the property shall be abated for 10 years, beginning on the later of October 1, 2011, or the 1st day following DCRA’s issuance of the certificate of occupancy for the property and UNCF’s physical occupancy of the property; provided, that:

(1)

The property shall be owned by UNCF during the duration of the abatement period;

(2)

The property continues to either be occupied by UNCF, or leased by UNCF to another nonprofit organization that works in a partnership with, and has a mission similar to, UNCF during the duration of the abatement period;

(3)

UNCF enters into a First Source Agreement with the Department of Employment Services for the duration of the abatement; and

(4)

UNCF shall have entered into an agreement with the Department of Small and Local Business Development requiring that at least 35% of the contract dollar volume for all tenant design, build-out, and improvements within the space owned by UNCF shall be reserved for local, small, and disadvantaged business enterprises, as certified pursuant to Subchapter IX-A of Chapter 2 of Title 2 [§ 2-218.01 et seq.].

(c)

The total abatement under this section shall not exceed:

(1)

In tax year 2012, $200,000; and

(2)

For each succeeding tax year, an amount equal to $400,000 in Fiscal Year 2012 dollars, plus an escalation of 3%, compounded annually, for each subsequent tax year for the duration of the abatement.

Aug. 6, 2010, D.C. Law 18-211, § 2(b), 57 DCR 4949

Section 5 of D.C. Law 18-211 provided: “Sec. 5. Applicability. This act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”

Section 7003 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 18-211, § 5.

Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 18-211, § 5, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 18-211, § 5, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).